dev/ortho/lat-ara.lexc
LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 

Punct ; 
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ; 
# ;

LEXICON Alpha

a:a AlphaLoop ; 
e:e AlphaLoop ; 
b:b AlphaLoop ; 
p:p AlphaLoop ; 
t:t AlphaLoop ; 
j:j AlphaLoop ; 
c:c AlphaLoop ; 
x:x AlphaLoop ; 
d:d AlphaLoop ; 
r:r AlphaLoop ; 
z:z AlphaLoop ; 
s:s AlphaLoop ; 
g:g AlphaLoop ; 
f:f AlphaLoop ; 
q:q AlphaLoop ; 
k:k AlphaLoop ; 
n:n AlphaLoop ; 
l:l AlphaLoop ; 
m:m AlphaLoop ; 
h:h AlphaLoop ; 
o:o AlphaLoop ; 
u:u AlphaLoop ; 
ö:ö AlphaLoop ; 
ü:ü AlphaLoop ; 
w:w AlphaLoop ; 
é:é AlphaLoop ; 
i:i AlphaLoop ; 
y:y AlphaLoop ; 
':' AlphaLoop ; 

A:a AlphaLoop ; 
E:e AlphaLoop ; 
B:b AlphaLoop ; 
P:p AlphaLoop ; 
T:t AlphaLoop ; 
J:j AlphaLoop ; 
C:c AlphaLoop ; 
X:x AlphaLoop ; 
D:d AlphaLoop ; 
R:r AlphaLoop ; 
Z:z AlphaLoop ; 
S:s AlphaLoop ; 
G:g AlphaLoop ; 
F:f AlphaLoop ; 
Q:q AlphaLoop ; 
K:k AlphaLoop ; 
N:n AlphaLoop ; 
L:l AlphaLoop ; 
M:m AlphaLoop ; 
H:h AlphaLoop ; 
O:o AlphaLoop ; 
U:u AlphaLoop ; 
Ö:ö AlphaLoop ;
Ü:ü AlphaLoop ; 
W:w AlphaLoop ; 
É:é AlphaLoop ; 
I:i AlphaLoop ; 
Y:y AlphaLoop ; 

# ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
!%,:%، # ;  ! Arabic comma
!،:، # ;
!,:، # ;
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
